North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54B. Savings and Loan Associations.
Article 11. Foreign Associations. [Repealed]

§§ 54B-221 through 54B-235.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1087, s. 6.

Cross References.

For the North Carolina Regional Reciprocal Savings and Loan Acquisition Act, and the effective date thereof, see

G.S. 54B-48.1

et seq.